New York, session 2025-2026, A4294.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions 1 and 2 of section 161 of the public service 2 law, as added by chapter 388 of the laws of 2011, are amended to read as 3 follows: 4 1. The board[, exclusive of the ad hoc members,] shall have the power 5 to adopt the rules and regulations relating to the procedures to be used 6 in certifying facilities under the provisions of this article, including 7 the suspension or revocation thereof, and shall further have the power 8 to seek delegation from the federal government pursuant to federal regu- 9 latory programs applicable to the siting of major electric facilities. 10 The chairperson, after consultation with the other members of the board 11 [exclusive of the ad hoc members], shall have exclusive jurisdiction to 12 issue declaratory rulings regarding the applicability of, or any other 13 question under, this article and rules and regulations adopted hereunder 14 and to grant requests for extensions or amendments to or transfers of 15 certificate terms and conditions, provided that no party to the proceed- 16 ing opposes such request for extensions or amendments within thirty days 17 of the filing of such request. Regulations adopted by the board may 18 provide for renewal applications for pollutant control permits to be 19 submitted to and acted upon by the department of environmental conserva- 20 tion following commercial operation of a certified facility. The board 21 shall not accept any pre-application preliminary scoping statement or 22 application for a certificate, or exercise any powers or functions until 23 the department of environmental conservation has promulgated rules and 24 regulations required by paragraphs (f) and (g) of subdivision one of EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01226-01-5 A. 4294 2 1 section one hundred sixty-four of this article and section 19-0312 of 2 the environmental conservation law; provided however that the board 3 shall be authorized to adopt rules and regulations required by this 4 article. 5 2. Upon receipt of a pre-application preliminary scoping statement 6 under this article, the chair shall promptly notify the governor, the 7 president pro tem of the senate, the speaker of the assembly, the chief 8 executive officers representing the municipality and the county in which 9 the facility is proposed to be located, and, if such facility is 10 proposed to be located within the city of New York, the mayor of the 11 city of New York, as well as the chairperson of the community board and 12 the borough president representing the area in which the facility is 13 proposed to be located. One ad hoc member shall be appointed by the 14 president pro tem of the senate and one ad hoc member shall be appointed 15 by the speaker of the assembly from a list of candidates submitted to 16 them, in the following manner. If such facility is proposed to be 17 located outside of the city of New York, the chief executive officer 18 representing the municipality shall nominate four candidates and the 19 chief executive officer representing the county shall nominate four 20 candidates for consideration. If such facility is proposed to be located 21 outside of the city of New York and in a village located within a town, 22 the chief executive officer representing the town shall nominate four 23 candidates, the chief executive officer representing the county shall 24 nominate four candidates, and the chief executive officer representing 25 the village shall nominate four candidates for consideration. If such 26 facility is proposed to be located in the city of New York, the chair- 27 person of the community board, the borough president, and the mayor of 28 the city of New York shall each nominate four candidates for consider- 29 ation. Nominations shall be submitted to the president pro tem of the 30 senate and the speaker of the assembly within fifteen days of receipt of 31 notification of the pre-application preliminary scoping statement. In 32 the event that the president pro tem of the senate does not appoint one 33 of the candidates within thirty days of such nominations, the governor 34 shall appoint the ad hoc member from the list of candidates. In the 35 event that the speaker of the assembly does not appoint one of the 36 candidates within thirty days of such nominations, the governor shall 37 appoint the ad hoc member from the list of candidates. [In the event 38 that one or both of the ad hoc public members have not been appointed 39 within forty-five days, a majority of persons named to the board shall 40 constitute a quorum] A majority of persons named to the board shall not 41 constitute a quorum unless both of the ad hoc public members have been 42 appointed. 43 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.